Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1377YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 29 Section 1. Section 481A.95, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 2. Fees for a license issued under this section shall 4 be no more than fifty dollars annually for a resident or a 5 nonresident fur dealer. 6